Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB162.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 17.125 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The following agencies are parts of Kentucky's juvenile justice system and shall,
subject to restrictions imposed by state or federal law, disclose and share with each
other all information they maintain on a juvenile in a facility or program or informal
adjustment authorized by law:
(a) All sheriff's offices, police departments, and any other law enforcement
agency;
(b) All Commonwealth's attorneys and county attorneys;
(c) The Attorney General;
(d) All jails and juvenile detention facilities, public and private;
(e) All courts and clerks of courts;
(f) The Administrative Office of the Courts;
(g) All departments within the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet; and
(h) All departments within the Cabinet for Health and Family Services[; and
(i) All family accountability, intervention, and response teams].
(2) Except as provided in this section, all information shared by agencies specified
above shall be subject to applicable confidentiality disclosure, redisclosure, and
access restrictions imposed by federal or state law.
(3) Once a complaint is filed with a court-designated worker alleging that a child has
committed a status offense or public offense, all public or private elementary or
secondary schools, vocational or business schools, or institutions of higher
education shall provide all records specifically requested in writing, and pertaining
to that child, to any of the agencies listed in subsection (1) of this section. Pursuant
to the authority granted to the Commonwealth under the Family Educational Rights
and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. sec. 1232g, when this section refers to the release of
Page 1 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
educational records, the purpose of the release shall be limited to providing the
juvenile justice system with the ability to effectively serve, prior to adjudication, the
needs of the student whose records are sought. The authorities to which the data are
released shall certify that any educational records obtained pursuant to this section
shall only be released to persons authorized by statute and shall not be released to
any other person without the written consent of the parent of the child. The request,
certification, and a record of the release shall be maintained in the student's file.
(4) Any request for records, the provision of records, the sharing of records, the
disclosure of records, or the redisclosure of records shall be done for official
purposes only, on a bona fide need to know basis, and only in connection with a
legitimate investigation, prosecution, treatment program, or educational program.
(5) Information and records relating to pending litigation in Circuit Court, District
Court, or a federal court and information and records relating to an ongoing
investigation are not subject to disclosure or sharing under this section.
(6) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a record relating to a minor or by sharing or
attempting to share a record relating to a minor with an unauthorized person is a
violation of this section.
Section 2. KRS 158.135 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "State agency children" means:
1. a. Those children of school age committed to or in custody of the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services and placed, or financed by
the cabinet, in a Cabinet for Health and Family Services operated
or contracted institution, treatment center, facility, including those
for therapeutic foster care and excluding those for nontherapeutic
foster care; or
b. Those children placed or financed by the Cabinet for Health and
Page 2 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
Family Services in a private facility pursuant to child care
agreements including those for therapeutic foster care and
excluding those for nontherapeutic foster care;
2. Those children of school age in home and community-based services
provided as an alternative to intermediate care facility services for the
intellectually disabled;
3. Those children committed to or in custody of the Department of
Juvenile Justice and placed in a department operated or contracted
facility or program; and
4. Those children referred by a court-designated worker as defined in
KRS 600.020[family accountability, intervention, and response team as
described in KRS 605.035] and admitted to a Department of Juvenile
Justice operated or contracted day treatment program;
(b) "Current costs and expenses" means all expenditures, other than for capital
outlay and debt service, which are in excess of the amount generated by state
agency children under the Support Education Excellence in Kentucky funding
formula pursuant to KRS 157.360. These expenditures are necessary to
provide a two hundred thirty (230) day school year, smaller teacher pupil
ratio, related services if identified on an individual educational plan, and more
intensive educational programming; and
(c) "Therapeutic foster care" means a remedial care program for troubled children
and youth that is in the least restrictive environment where the foster parent is
trained to implement planned, remedial supervision and care leading to
positive changes in the child's behavior. Children served in this placement
have serious emotional problems and meet one (1) or more of the following
criteria:
1. Imminent release from a treatment facility;
Page 3 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
2. Aggressive or destructive behavior;
3. At risk of being placed in more restrictive settings, including
institutionalization; or
4. Numerous placement failures.
(2) (a) Unless otherwise provided by the General Assembly in a budget bill, any
county or independent school district that provides elementary or secondary
school services to state agency children shall be reimbursed through a contract
with the Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children. The
school services furnished to state agency children shall be equal to those
furnished to other school children of the district.
(b) The Department of Education shall, to the extent possible within existing
appropriations, set aside an amount of the state agency children funds
designated by the General Assembly in the biennial budget to reimburse a
school district for its expenditures exceeding twenty percent (20%) of the total
amount received from state and federal sources to serve a state agency child.
(3) The General Assembly shall, if possible, increase funding for the education
programs for state agency children by a percentage increase equal to that provided
in the biennial budget for the base funding level for each pupil in the program to
support education excellence in Kentucky under KRS 157.360 and, if applicable, by
an amount necessary to address increases in the number of state agency children
being served.
(4) The Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children shall make to
the chief state school officer the reports required concerning school services for
state agency children, and shall file with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services
unit operating or regulating the institution or day treatment center, or contracting
for services, in which the children are located a copy of the annual report made to
the chief state school officer.
Page 4 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
(5) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall contract with a public university or
nonprofit education entity utilizing all funds generated by the children in state
agency programs, except Oakwood and Hazelwood funds, and the funds in the
Kentucky Department of Education budget, pursuant to this section, as well as any
other educational funds for which all Kentucky children are entitled. The total of
these funds shall be utilized to provide educational services through the Kentucky
Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children established in KRS 605.110.
(6) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute, the Kentucky Educational
Collaborative for State Agency Children shall operate a two hundred thirty (230)
day school program.
Section 3. KRS 200.505 is amended to read as follows:
There is hereby created a State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to
Children and Transition-Age Youth. The chairperson of the council shall be designated
by the Governor and shall establish procedures for the council's internal procedures.
(1) This council shall be composed of the following:
(a) Members who shall serve by virtue of their positions:
1. The commissioner of the Department of Education;[,]
2. The commissioner of the Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities;[,]
3. The commissioner of the Department for Community Based Services;[,]
4. The commissioner of the Department for Public Health;[,]
5. The commissioner of the Department for Medicaid Services;[,]
6. The commissioner of the Department of Juvenile Justice;[,]
7. The director of the Division of Family Resource and Youth Services
Centers;[,]
8. The executive director of the Office for Children with Special Health
Care Needs;[,]
Page 5 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
9. The executive officer of the Department of Family and Juvenile Services
of the Administrative Office of the Courts;[,]
10. The chair of the Subcommittee for Equity and Justice for all Youth of
the Juvenile Justice Advisory Board;[,]
11. The executive director of the Kentucky Housing Corporation;[,]
12. The executive director of the Kentucky Office of Vocational
Rehabilitation;[,] and
13. The president of the Council on Postsecondary Education, or their
designees;
(b) The chairperson of the council shall appoint one (1) parent of a child or
transition-age youth with a behavioral health need, who is a consumer of
services and supports within the system of care to serve as a member of the
council, and one (1) parent who meets the same criteria to serve as the parent
member's alternate to serve in the absence of the parent member. For each
appointment to be made, the State Interagency Council for Services and
Supports to Children and Transition-Age Youth shall vote on nominations
submitted by members. The nominee receiving the most votes shall be
appointed. Appointees shall serve a term of two (2) years and may be
reappointed to additional two (2) year terms. If the child of the parent member
or alternate parent member ceases to be a consumer of services and supports
within the system of care during the term of appointment, the member shall be
eligible to serve out the remainder of the term of appointment. The alternate
parent member may attend and participate in all council meetings but shall
vote only in the absence of the parent member. The parent member and
alternate parent member shall receive no compensation in addition to that
which they may already receive as service providers or state employees who
are required to attend as part of their duties, but the parent member and
Page 6 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
alternate parent member shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred through
the performance of their duties as council members if it is outside the scope of
their job duties;
(c) The chairperson of the council shall appoint one (1) youth between the ages of
sixteen (16) and twenty-five (25), who has a behavioral health disorder and
who is receiving or has received services to address mental health, substance
use, or co-occurring mental health and substance use disorder, to serve as a
member of the council, and one (1) youth who meets the same criteria to serve
as the youth member's alternate in the absence of the youth member. For each
appointment to be made, the State Interagency Council for Services and
Supports to Children and Transition-Age Youth shall vote on nominations
submitted by members. The nominee receiving the most votes shall be
appointed. Appointees shall serve a term of two (2) years and may be
reappointed to additional two (2) year terms, and the youth member and the
youth member's alternate shall be eligible to serve out the remainder of their
term of appointment regardless of age. The alternate youth member may
attend and participate in all council meetings but shall vote only in the
absence of the youth member. The youth member and alternate youth member
shall receive no compensation in addition to that which they may already
receive as service providers or state employees who are required to attend as
part of their duties, but the youth member and alternate youth member shall be
reimbursed for expenses incurred through the performance of their duties as
council members if it is outside the scope of their job duties;
(d) The chairperson of the council shall appoint one (1) member of a nonprofit
family organization representing consumers of services and supports within
the system of care whose membership, leadership, and governance include
parents, primary caregivers, or children or transition-age youth with serious
Page 7 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
emotional, behavioral, or mental health needs, to serve as a member of the
council. For each appointment to be made, the chair shall publicly post on the
State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to Children and
Transition-Age Youth website[Web site] a solicitation for letters of interest
from qualified organizations and submit all qualified responses to a vote of
the full membership. The organization which receives the most votes shall
designate a representative to serve a term of two (2) years, and may be
reappointed to additional two (2) year terms. The family organization member
shall receive no compensation in addition to that which the member may
already receive as an employee who is required to attend as part of his or her
duties, but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred through the performance
of duties as a council member if it is outside the scope of his or her job duties;
and
(e) At the end of a term, a member shall continue to serve until a successor is
appointed.
(2) The State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to Children and
Transition-Age Youth shall:
(a) Make recommendations annually to the Governor and the Legislative
Research Commission regarding the system of care for children and
transition-age youth with or at risk of behavioral health needs;
(b) Direct each regional interagency council to operate as the regional locus of
accountability for the system of care;[:
1. Operate as the regional locus of accountability for the system of care;
and
2. Participate in family accountability, intervention, and response teams
established pursuant to KRS 605.035;]
(c) Assess the effectiveness of regional councils in serving as the locus of
Page 8 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
accountability for the system of care for children and transition-age youth
with or at risk of behavioral health needs;
(d) Meet at least monthly and maintain records of meetings; and
(e) Develop a comprehensive array of services and supports to meet the needs of
children and transition-age youth with or at risk of developing behavioral
health needs.
(3) Agencies represented on the state council shall adopt interagency agreements as
necessary to advance the system of care.
(4) The State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to Children and
Transition-Age Youth may promulgate administrative regulations necessary to
comply with the requirements of KRS 200.501 to 200.509.
Section 4. KRS 200.509 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There are hereby created regional interagency councils for the system of care.
These councils shall be formed in each area development district within the
Commonwealth of Kentucky, except that those area development districts that
contain a county with a population greater than one hundred thousand (100,000)
may form up to three (3) such councils. The regional interagency councils shall be
chaired by one (1) member, chosen by a majority vote of the members. Each
council shall be composed of the following members:
(a) The children's services director from each regional community mental health
center or his or her[their] designee;
(b) One (1) court-designated specialist or court-designated worker chosen by the
executive officer of the Department of Family and Juvenile Services of the
Administrative Office of the Courts;
(c) One (1) special education cooperative representative with behavioral health
experience chosen by the directors of cooperatives in the area served by the
regional council;
Page 9 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
(d) One (1) parent of a child with a behavioral health need, who is or has been a
consumer of system of care services and supports, and one (1) parent who
meets the same criteria to serve as the parent member's alternate, who may
attend and participate in all council meetings, but shall vote only in the
absence of the parent member. For each appointment to be made, the regional
interagency council for which the appointment is to be made shall submit to
the chair of the State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to
Children and Transition-Age Youth a list of two (2) names of parents who are
qualified for appointment from which list the chair of the State Interagency
Council for Services and Supports to Children and Transition-Age Youth shall
make the appointment. Appointees shall serve a term of two (2) years, and
may be reappointed to additional two (2) year terms. If the child of the parent
member or alternate parent member ceases to be a consumer of system of care
services and supports during the term of appointment, the member shall be
eligible to serve out the remainder of the term of appointment;
(e) One (1) transition-age youth who has a behavioral health disorder and who is
receiving or has received a service to address mental health, substance use, or
co-occurring mental health and substance use disorder, and one (1) transition-
age youth who meets the same criteria to serve as the youth member's
alternate in the absence of the youth member. For each appointment to be
made, the regional interagency council for which the appointment is to be
made shall submit to the chair of the State Interagency Council for Services
and Supports to Children and Transition-Age Youth a list of two (2) names of
transition-age youth who are qualified for appointment from which list the
chair of the State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to Children
and Transition-Age Youth shall make the appointment. Appointees shall serve
a term of two (2) years, and may be reappointed to additional two (2) year
Page 10 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
terms. If the youth member or alternate youth member ceases to be a
consumer of system of care services and supports during the term of
appointment, the member shall be eligible to serve out the remainder of the
term of appointment;
(f) Any other local public or private agency that provides services and supports to
children and transition-age youth with behavioral health needs which the
regional interagency council may invite to have a representative become a
permanent or temporary member of the council; and
(g) One (1) representative from each of the Department of Juvenile Justice,
family resource and youth services centers, the Kentucky Office of Vocational
Rehabilitation, the Department for Community Based Services, and local
health departments.
(2) A[No] member of a regional interagency council for the system of care shall not be
given compensation in addition to that which they already receive as service
providers or state employees, except that the parent and youth members and
alternate parent and youth members of regional interagency councils shall be
reimbursed by the regional interagency council's contracted fiscal agent for all
expenses incurred through the performance of their duties as council members if it
is outside the scope of their job duties.
(3) Each regional interagency council for the system of care shall perform the
following functions:
(a) Conduct regional system of care planning and operations;
(b) Coordinate system-level continuous quality improvement;
(c) Identify and develop system of care expansion opportunities;
(d) Promote awareness of the system of care;
(e) Initiate and adopt interagency agreements as necessary for providing services
and supports to children and transition-age youth with or at risk of behavioral
Page 11 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
health needs by the agencies represented in the regional council; and
(f) Advise the state interagency council regarding the system of care within the
region[; and
(g) Participate in family accountability, intervention, and response teams
established pursuant to KRS 605.035].
(4) The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and the designee of the
Kentucky[State] Department of Education shall ensure that regional interagency
councils for the system of care are formed.
(5) Local interagency councils for the system of care may be formed at the discretion of
a regional interagency council to advance the functions of the regional interagency
council at the city, county, or other local community level.
Section 5. KRS 605.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A court-designated worker may:
(a) Receive complaints;
(b) Review complaints taken by peace officers;
(c) Investigate complaints except neglect, abuse, and dependency;
(d) Perform an initial screening for human trafficking as defined in KRS 529.010
for referral to the cabinet for investigation as a case of dependency, neglect, or
abuse;
(e) Dispose of complaints limited to a total of three (3) status or nonfelony public
offense complaints per child and, with written approval of the county
attorney, one (1) felony complaint that does not involve the commission of a
sexual offense or the use of a deadly weapon;
(f) Administer oaths;
(g) Issue summonses;
(h) Issue subpoenas;
(i) Make advisory dispositional recommendations and provide, within forty-eight
Page 12 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
(48) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, information concerning a
child who has chosen to waive the investigation pursuant to KRS 610.100;
(j) Perform such duties as required by KRS Chapter 645;
(k) Administer evidence-based screenings and assessments to identify the risk
and needs of a child and his or her family;
(l) Enter into diversion agreements, including referral to programs or service
providers, providing case management and service coordination, assisting
with barriers to completion, and monitoring progress;
(m) Impose graduated sanctions, from least restrictive to most restrictive, in
response to violations of the terms of a diversion agreement;
(n) Gather information necessary to track and record outcomes of all diversion
agreement recommendations and final diversion disposition;
(o) Collaborate and cooperate with the [family accountability, intervention, and
response team, ]director of pupil personnel as appropriate, and service
providers to ensure all appropriate interventions are utilized;
(p) Report annually to his or her local public school districts and to the
Administrative Office of the Courts an inventory of all programs and service
providers within the judicial district they serve;
(q) Request from the schools a student's education records pursuant to KRS
17.125; and
(r) Perform such other functions related to activities of children as may be
authorized or directed by the court.
(2) Upon the filing of a petition which initiates a formal court action in the interest of
the child, the court-designated worker's involvement, with the exception of the
activities defined in subsection (1)(i) of this section, shall cease.
(3) When a child is to be tried as an adult, the court-designated worker need not make
dispositional recommendations.
Page 13 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
Section 6. KRS 605.130 is amended to read as follows:
In addition to the other duties, functions, and responsibilities imposed by law, the cabinet,
through its authorized representatives, shall have general supervision and management of
all matters contained in KRS 620.150 and 620.170 and shall, wherever possible:
(1) Locate and plan for all children who are dependent, neglected, or abused;
(2) Cooperate with and assist the courts of the various counties;
(3) Assist Circuit Courts through services to children whenever requested by the court.
The cabinet may charge a reasonable fee for such services to be taxed as costs by
the court;
(4) [Assess all referrals received from a court-designated worker, pursuant to direction
from the family accountability, intervention, and response team, to determine
whether a basis exists to file a dependency, neglect, or abuse petition;
(5) ]Track and report to the oversight council created in KRS 15A.063 the number of
referrals received, the number of investigations made upon those referrals, and the
number and type of petitions filed in response;
(5)[(6)] Identify all youth who have status offense charges and are committed or
probated to the cabinet and report the number of committed and probated youth to
the oversight council created in KRS 15A.063; and
(6)[(7)] Perform such other services as may be deemed necessary for the protection of
children.
Section 7. KRS 610.030 is amended to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in KRS Chapters 600 to 645:
(1) If any person files a complaint alleging that a child, except a child alleged to be
neglected, abused, dependent, or mentally ill who is subject to the jurisdiction of the
court, may be within the purview of KRS Chapters 600 to 645, the court-designated
worker shall make a preliminary determination as to whether the complaint is
complete. In any case where the court-designated worker finds that the complaint is
Page 14 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
incomplete, the court-designated worker shall return the complaint without delay to
the person or agency originating the complaint or having knowledge of the facts, or
to the appropriate law enforcement agency having investigative jurisdiction of the
offense, and request additional information in order to complete the complaint. The
complainant shall promptly furnish the additional information requested;
(2) (a) Upon receipt of a complaint which appears to be complete and which alleges
that a child has committed a public offense, the court-designated worker shall
refer the complaint to the county attorney for review pursuant to KRS
635.010.
(b) If after review the county attorney elects to proceed, the court-designated
worker shall conduct a preliminary intake inquiry to recommend whether the
interests of the child or the public require that further action be taken or
whether, in the interest of justice, the complaint can be resolved informally
without the filing of a petition;
(3) Upon receipt of a complaint that appears to be complete and that alleges that the
child has committed a status offense, the court-designated worker shall conduct a
preliminary intake inquiry to determine whether the interests of the child or the
public require that further action be taken;
(4) Prior to conducting a preliminary intake inquiry, the court-designated worker shall
notify the child and the child's parent, guardian, or other person exercising custodial
control or supervision of the child in writing:
(a) Of their opportunity to be present at the preliminary intake inquiry;
(b) That they may have counsel present during the preliminary intake inquiry as
well as the formal conference thereafter;
(c) 1. That all information supplied by the child to a court-designated worker
during any process prior to the filing of the petition shall be deemed
confidential and shall not be subject to subpoena or to disclosure
Page 15 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
without the written consent of the child.
2. Information may be shared between treatment providers and[,] the
court-designated worker[, and the family accountability, intervention,
and response team] to enable the court-designated worker to facilitate
services and facilitate compliance with the diversion agreement; and
(d) That the child has the right to deny the allegation and demand a formal court
hearing;
(5) The preliminary intake inquiry shall include the administration of an evidence-
based screening tool and, if appropriate and available, a validated risk and needs
assessment, in order to identify whether the child and his or her family are in need
of services and the level of intervention needed;
(6) (a) Upon the completion of the preliminary intake inquiry for a minor who is
alleged to be a status offender under KRS 630.020(3) and is alleged to have
been absent without excuse for fifteen (15) or more days during a school year,
the court-designated worker shall refer the complaint to the county attorney.
The county attorney shall then refer the complaint:
1. For formal court action; or
2. To be handled under subsection (8) of this section.
(b) Upon the completion of the preliminary intake inquiry for a minor who is
alleged to be beyond the control of the school under KRS 630.020(2), the
court-designated worker shall refer the complaint to the county attorney.
The county attorney shall then refer the complaint:
1. For formal court action; or
2. To be handled under subsection (8) of this section.
(c) Upon the completion of the preliminary intake inquiry for all other
allegations, the court-designated worker may:
1. If the complaint alleges a status offense, determine that no further action
Page 16 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
be taken[ subject to review by the family accountability, intervention,
and response team];
2. If the complaint alleges a public offense, refer the complaint to the
county attorney;
3. Refer a public offense complaint for informal adjustment; or
4. Based upon the results of the preliminary intake inquiry, other
information obtained, and a determination that the interests of the child
and the public would be better served, and with the written approval of
the county attorney for a public offense complaint, if necessary, conduct
a formal conference and enter into a diversion agreement;
(7) Upon receiving written approval of the county attorney, if necessary, to divert a
public offense complaint, and prior to conducting a formal conference, the court-
designated worker shall advise in writing the complainant, the victim if any, and the
law enforcement agency having investigative jurisdiction of the offense:
(a) Of the recommendation and the reasons for the recommendation[therefor]
and that the complainant, victim, or law enforcement agency may submit
within ten (10) days from receipt of the[such] notice a complaint to the county
attorney for special review; or
(b) In the case of a misdemeanor diverted pursuant to KRS 635.010(4), of the fact
that the child was statutorily entitled to divert the case;
(8) A formal conference shall include the child and his or her parent, guardian, or other
person exercising custodial control or supervision. The formal conference shall be
used to:
(a) Present information obtained at the preliminary intake inquiry; and
(b) 1. Develop a diversion agreement that shall:
a. i. Require that the child regularly attend school and refrain
from conduct that constitutes cause for suspension or
Page 17 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
expulsion from school;[ and]
ii. For a child against whom a complaint alleging truancy has
been filed, require that if the child is absent from school
without excuse for four (4) days during the[a] diversion
agreement, the child shall immediately be considered to have
failed to complete the diversion agreement and subsection
(9)(b)3. of this section shall immediately apply; and
iii. For a child against whom a complaint alleging the child is
beyond the control of the school has been filed, require that
if the child is suspended or expelled during the diversion
agreement due solely to a behavioral incident that takes
place after the child enters into the diversion agreement,
and upon consultation between the court-designated
worker and the county attorney, the county attorney
determines that the child had adequate opportunity to
engage in any available services referred by the court-
designated worker, the child shall immediately be
considered to have failed to complete the diversion
agreement and subsection (9)(b)4. of this section shall
immediately apply; and
b. Not exceed twelve (12) months in duration, and may include:
i. Referral of the child, and family if appropriate, to a public or
private entity or person for the provision of identified
services to address the complaint or assessed needs;
ii. Referral of the child, and family if appropriate, to a
community service program within the limitations provided
under KRS 635.080(2);
Page 18 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
iii. Restitution, limited to the actual pecuniary loss suffered by
the victim, if the child has the means or ability to make
restitution;
iv. Notification that the court-designated worker may apply
graduated sanctions for failure to comply with the diversion
agreement;
v. Any other program or effort which reasonably benefits the
community and the child; and
vi. A plan for monitoring the child's progress and completion of
the agreement.
2. Prior to developing the diversion agreement, the court-designated
worker or court-designated specialist shall contact the school district
that the child attends to obtain background information from school
personnel regarding family background, education records, any services
previously provided, and any recommended trauma informed strategies[.
3. Upon developing a diversion agreement, the court-designated specialist
shall make all details of the agreement accessible to all members of the
family, accountability, intervention, and response team through an
electronic platform provided by the Administrative Office of the
Courts];
(9) (a) If a child successfully completes a diversion agreement, the underlying
complaint shall be dismissed and further action related to that complaint shall
be prohibited.
(b) If a child fails to appear for a preliminary intake inquiry, declines to enter into
a diversion agreement, or fails to complete a diversion agreement, then:
1. For a public offense complaint, the matter shall be referred to the county
attorney for formal court action and, if a petition is filed, the child may
Page 19 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
request that the court dismiss the complaint based upon his or her
substantial compliance with the terms of diversion;
2. For a status offense complaint, except as provided for in
subparagraphs[subparagraph] 3. and 4. of this paragraph, the court-
designated worker shall refer the matter to the county attorney for
consultation and, if a petition is filed, the child may request that the
court dismiss the complaint based upon his or her substantial
compliance with the terms of the diversion;[family accountability,
intervention, and response team for review and further action; and]
3. For a status offense complaint alleging truancy for which the child failed
diversion in accordance with subsection (8)(b)1.a.ii. of this section, the
matter shall immediately be referred to the county attorney for formal
court action; and
4. For a status offense complaint alleging beyond the control of the
school for which the child failed diversion in accordance with
subsection (8)(b)1.a.iii. of this section, the matter shall immediately be
referred to the county attorney for formal court action.
(c) [If the child enters into a diversion agreement or is referred to the family
accountability, intervention, and response team for truancy and there is no
action implemented by the family accountability, intervention, and response
team within thirty (30) days, the family accountability, intervention, and
response team shall report to the court the reasons for inaction and shall
provide a plan for action on the child's case. The court shall review on the
record any diversion agreement and any report, without the attendance or
appearance of the child, at regular intervals at the court's discretion to verify
family accountability, intervention, and response team member attendance,
team accountability, and performance.
Page 20 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 162/GA
(d) ]If a child fails to appear for a preliminary intake inquiry or fails to complete a
diversion agreement due to lack of parental cooperation, the court-designated
worker shall make a determination that the child failed to complete the
diversion due to lack of parent cooperation;
(10) If a complaint is referred to the court, the complaint and findings of the court-
designated worker's preliminary intake inquiry shall be submitted to the court for
the court to determine whether process should issue;
(11) If the court receives a report with a determination that the diversion is failed due to
lack of parental cooperation, the court may order parental cooperation and refer the
case back to the court-designated worker. The child shall not be detained upon this
finding; and
(12) At any stage in the proceedings described in this section, the court or the county
attorney may review any decision of the court-designated worker. The court upon
its own motion or upon written request of the county attorney may refer any
complaint for a formal hearing.
Section 8. The following KRS section is repealed:
605.035 Family accountability, intervention, and response teams -- Purpose --
Membership.
Page 21 of 21
SB016210.100 - 1911 - XXXX 2/24/2026 3:16 PM GA